District of Columbia statutes.
44-733

Asbestos abatement — Rules and regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to issue rules and regulations, in accordance with recommendations of the Task Force, to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-173, § 4, 32 DCR 736

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-119.3.